Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1751.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 13-757, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-757. Method of infliction of sentence of death; identity of executioners; license suspension A. The penalty of death shall be inflicted by firing squad, lethal gas or an intravenous injection of a substance or substances in a lethal quantity sufficient to cause death, under the supervision of the state department of corrections. B. A defendant who is sentenced to death for an offense committed before November 23, 1992 shall choose either firing squad, lethal injection or lethal gas at least twenty days before the execution date. If the defendant fails to choose either lethal injection or lethal gas, The penalty of death shall be inflicted by lethal injection if the defendant fails to choose a manner of death. C. The identity of executioners and other persons who participate or perform ancillary functions in an execution and any information contained in records that would identify those persons is confidential and is not subject to disclosure pursuant to title 39, chapter 1, article 2. D. If a person who participates or performs ancillary functions in an execution is licensed by a board, the licensing board shall not suspend or revoke the person's license as a result of the person's participation in an execution. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Conditional enactment This act does not become effective unless the Constitution of Arizona is amended by the vote of the people at the next general election by the passage of Senate Concurrent Resolution 1049, fifty-seventh legislature, second regular session, relating to capital punishment.